Utah statutes.
9-4-610.   Profit from projects prohibited -- Criteria for determining
rentals and payments.
(1)  It is declared to be the policy of this state to accomplish the public,
governmental, and charitable purposes of this part that:
(a)  each authority manage and operate its housing projects in an efficient
manner to enable it to provide decent, safe, and sanitary dwelling
accommodations for persons of medium and low income and fix the rentals or
payments for these accommodations for persons of low income at low rates; and
(b)  no authority be operated as a source of revenue to the city or county.
(2)  To this end each authority shall fix the rentals or payments for
dwellings in its projects at no higher rates than it finds necessary in order
to produce revenues that, together with all other available moneys, revenues,
income, and receipts of the authority from whatever sources derived, including
federal financial assistance necessary to maintain the low-rent character of
the projects, is sufficient to:
(a)  pay, as they become due, the principal and interest on the bonds of the
authority;
(b)  create and maintain reserves required to assure the payment of principal
and interest as it becomes due on its bonds;
(c)  meet the cost of, and provide for, maintaining and operating the
projects, including necessary reserves and the cost of any insurance, and the
administrative expenses of the authority; and
(d)  make payments in lieu of taxes and, after payment in full of all
obligations for which federal annual contributions are pledged, make
repayments of federal and local contributions as it determines are consistent
with the maintenance of the low-rent character of projects.
(3)  Rentals or payments for dwellings shall be established and the projects
administered, in so far as possible, to assure that any federal financial
assistance required is strictly limited to amounts and periods necessary to
maintain the low-rent character of the projects.
(4)  Nothing in this section may be construed to limit the amount an authority
may charge for nondwelling facilities.
(5)  All such income, together with other income and revenue, shall be used in
the operation of the projects to aid in accomplishing the public,
governmental, and charitable purposes of this part.
